Maryland, session 2025, HB1183.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
15–701.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) (1) “Drivers’ school” means, except as provided in paragraph (2) of this
subsection, any person in the business of giving instruction in the driving of motor vehicles.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1183*

HOUSE BILL 1183
(2) “Drivers’ school” does not include:
(i) Any public school or other noncollegiate educational institution
giving instruction in the driving of motor vehicles during its normal school hours and not
charging a fee for this instruction; or
(ii) Any college, university, or other institution of postsecondary
education approved by the Maryland Higher Education Commission.
(c) “License” means a drivers’ school license issued by the Administration under
this subtitle.
15–708.
(A) Each licensee shall maintain all vehicles used for instruction in the condition
that the Administration requires.
(B) A VEHICLE THAT IS OLDER THAN 10 MODEL YEARS MAY NOT BE USED
FOR INSTRUCTION IN A DRIVERS’ SCHOOL.
16–501.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(d) “Driver education program” means the courses and learning activities
designated by the Administration in consultation with the State Department of Education
that an individual may be required to complete before obtaining a noncommercial driver’s
license under this title.
16–505.
(a) The Administration shall, in consultation with the State Department of
Education, adopt and enforce regulations not inconsistent with this subtitle to implement
a standardized driver education program conducted by driver education schools under its
jurisdiction.
(b) Regulations adopted under this section shall be administered by the
Administration and shall include:
(1) Curriculum, equipment, and facility standards for classroom,
laboratory, and on–road instruction phases;
(2) Minimum student performance standards for an approved driver
education program based upon the standardized curriculum approved by the
Administration, consisting of at least 30 hours of classroom instruction and at least 6 hours
of highway driving instruction;

HOUSE BILL 1183 3
(3) Standards for the certification of schools and instructors;
(4) A system to evaluate the effectiveness of the driver education program;
(5) Standards governing the required offering of the driver education
program, based on the capacity, enrollment, staff, and facilities of the schools; [and]
(6) Standards for the eligibility of individuals to enroll in the program; AND
(7) A REQUIREMENT THAT A VEHICLE USED FOR INSTRUCTION IN A
DRIVER EDUCATION PROGRAM MAY NOT BE OLDER THAN 10 MODEL YEARS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.